hu: Kitámasztó rögzítési pozíciója: Középcsapágyas rögzítés; Középső rögzítés; Láncvillás rögzítés; Bilincses rögzítés; Lemezes rögzítés; Hátsó tengelyes rögzítés; Hátsó papucsos rögzítés; Hátsó rögzítés; Támvillás rögzítés; Egyéb
cs: Montážní poloha stojánku: Montáž na středové složení; Montáž na střed; Montáž na řetězovou vzpěru; Montáž pomocí svorky; Montáž na destičku; Montáž na osu zadního kola; Montáž na zadní patku; Montáž dozadu; Montáž na sedlovou vzpěru; Jiné
zh-CN: 脚撑安装位置: 中轴安装; 居中安装; 后下叉安装; 夹紧式安装; 安装板安装; 后轴安装; 后勾爪安装; 后置安装; 后上叉安装; 其他
de: Montageposition des Seitenständers: Tretlager-Befestigung; Mittelbau-Befestigung; Kettenstreben-Befestigung; Klemm-Befestigung; Platten-Befestigung; Hinterachs-Befestigung; Befestigung am hinteren Ausfallende; Hinterbau-Befestigung; Sitzstreben-Befestigung; Sonstige
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งขาตั้ง: จุดยึดกระโหลกจักรยาน; จุดยึดกึ่งกลาง; จุดยึดหางหลังล่าง; จุดยึดแบบแคลมป์; จุดยึดแบบแผ่นป้าย; จุดยึดเพลาหลัง; จุดยึดหางหลังบริเวณแกนล้อ; จุดยึดด้านหลัง; จุดยึดหางหลังบน; อื่นๆ
sv: Monteringsläge för sparkstöd: Fäste för vevlager; Mittfäste; Fäste för kedjestag; Klämfäste; Plattfäste; Fäste för bakaxel; Fäste för bakre dropout; Bakre fäste; Fäste för sadelstag; Övrigt
pl: Położenie mocowania podpórki rowerowej: Montaż do suportu; Montaż centralny; Montaż do rurki łańcuchowej; Montaż na zacisk; Montaż na płytkę; Montaż na tylną oś; Montaż do haków ramy; Montaż z tyłu; Montaż na widełkach górnych; Inny
fr: Emplacement de montage de la béquille: Montage sur boîtier de pédalier; Montage central; Montage sur base arrière; Montage à collier; Montage sur plaque; Montage sur axe arrière; Montage sur patte de dérailleur; Montage arrière; Montage sur hauban; Autre
nb: Støttebenets monteringsposisjon: Kranklagerfeste; Senterfeste; Kjedestagfeste; Klemmefeste; Platefeste; Bakakselfeste; Bakre dropout-feste; Bakfeste; Setestagfeste; Annet
en: Kickstand mounting position: Bottom bracket mount; Center mount; Chainstay mount; Clamp-on mount; Plate mount; Rear axle mount; Rear dropout mount; Rear mount; Seatstay mount; Other
pt-BR: Descanso de bicicleta posição de montagem: Montagem no movimento central; Montagem central; Montagem no chainstay; Montagem tipo abraçadeira; Montagem em placa; Montagem no eixo traseiro; Montagem na gancheira traseira; Montagem traseira; Montagem no seatstay; Outra
pt-PT: Posição de montagem do descanso: Suporte do eixo pedaleiro; Suporte central; Suporte da escora inferior; Suporte de braçadeira; Suporte de placa; Suporte do eixo traseiro; Suporte do gancho traseiro; Suporte traseiro; Suporte da escora superior; Outro
ko: 킥스탠드 장착 위치: 바텀 브래킷 마운트; 센터 마운트; 체인스테이 마운트; 클램프온 마운트; 플레이트 마운트; 리어 액슬 마운트; 리어 드롭아웃 마운트; 리어 마운트; 시트스테이 마운트; 기타
ro-RO: Poziția de montare a cricului lateral (kickstand): Montare pe butucul pedalier; Montare centrală; Montare pe chainstay; Montare cu clemă; Montare pe placă; Montare pe axul din spate; Montare pe urechea cadrului; Montare pe spate; Montare pe seatstay; Altele
it: Posizione di montaggio del cavalletto: Montaggio su movimento centrale; Montaggio centrale; Montaggio sui foderi orizzontali; Montaggio a morsetto; Montaggio su piastra; Montaggio su perno posteriore; Montaggio sui forcellini posteriori; Montaggio posteriore; Montaggio sui foderi verticali; Altro
fi: Seisontatuen kiinnityskohta: Keskiökiinnitys; Keskikiinnitys; Takahaarukan alaputken kiinnitys; Puristuskiinnitys; Levykiinnitys; Taka-akselin kiinnitys; Taka-akselin korvakkeen kiinnitys; Takakiinnitys; Takahaarukan yläputken kiinnitys; Muu
bg-BG: Позиция за монтаж на стойката: Монтаж на средното движение; Централен монтаж; Монтаж на долната тръба на задната вилка; Монтаж със скоба; Монтаж с планка; Монтаж на задната ос; Монтаж на задния дропаут; Заден монтаж; Монтаж на горната тръба на задната вилка; Друго
hr-HR: Položaj za montažu oslonca: Nosač srednje osovine; Središnji nosač; Nosač na donju cijev stražnje vilice; Nosač na stezaljku; Nosač na pločicu; Nosač na stražnju osovinu; Nosač na stražnje uho vilice; Stražnji nosač; Nosač na gornju cijev stražnje vilice; Ostalo
nl: Fietsstandaard montagepositie: Trapas-bevestiging; Middenbevestiging; Liggende achtervorkbevestiging; Klembevestiging; Plaatbevestiging; Achterasbevestiging; Achterpadbevestiging; Achterbevestiging; Staande achtervorkbevestiging; Anders
ja: キックスタンドの取り付け位置: ボトムブラケットマウント; センターマウント; チェーンステーマウント; クランプオンマウント; プレートマウント; リアアクスルマウント; リアドロップアウトマウント; リアマウント; シートステーマウント; その他
zh-TW: 腳架安裝位置: 五通管安裝; 居中安裝; 下叉安裝; 夾鉗式安裝; 底板安裝; 後軸安裝; 後鉤爪安裝; 後部安裝; 後上叉安裝; 其他
sl-SI: Položaj montaže stojala: Namestitev na gonilni ležaj; Sredinska namestitev; Namestitev na cev ob verigi; Namestitev s sponko; Namestitev na ploščico; Namestitev na zadnjo os; Namestitev na zadnje osišče; Zadnja namestitev; Namestitev na cev ob sedežu; Drugo
tr: Kickstandın monte edildiği konum: Orta göbek montajlı; Merkez montajlı; Alt çatal montajlı; Kelepçeli montajlı; Plaka montajlı; Arka aks montajlı; Arka maşa montajlı; Arka montajlı; Üst çatal montajlı; Diğer
lt-LT: Atraminės kojelės montavimo vieta: Tvirtinama prie centrinės ašies; Tvirtinama viduryje; Tvirtinama prie grandinės šakės; Tvirtinama spaustuku; Tvirtinama plokštele; Tvirtinama prie galinės ašies; Tvirtinama prie galinio rėmo laikiklio; Tvirtinama gale; Tvirtinama prie sėdynės šakės; Kita
vi: Vị trí lắp chân chống: Gắn trục giữa; Gắn giữa; Gắn càng dưới; Gắn kẹp; Gắn tấm bản; Gắn trục sau; Gắn dropout sau; Gắn sau; Gắn càng trên; Khác
ru: Положение крепления подножки: Крепление на каретку; Центральное крепление; Крепление на нижнее перо; Хомутное крепление; Крепление на площадку; Крепление на заднюю ось; Крепление на дропаут; Заднее крепление; Крепление на верхнее перо; Другое
sk-SK: Poloha upevnenia stojana: Montáž na stredové zloženie; Stredová montáž; Montáž na reťazovú vzperu; Montáž na svorku; Montáž na platňu; Montáž na zadnú os; Montáž na zadné pätky; Zadná montáž; Montáž na sedlovú vzperu; Iné
es: Posición de montaje del caballete: Montaje en eje de pedalier; Montaje central; Montaje en vaina inferior; Montaje con abrazadera; Montaje en placa; Montaje en eje trasero; Montaje en puntera trasera; Montaje trasero; Montaje en vaina superior; Otro
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης σταντ: Βάση μεσαίας τριβής; Κεντρική βάση; Βάση οριζόντιου ψαλιδιού; Βάση με σφιγκτήρα; Βάση πλάκας; Βάση πίσω άξονα; Βάση πίσω dropout; Πίσω βάση; Βάση κάθετου ψαλιδιού; Άλλο
da: Monteringsposition for støtteben: Montering på krankboks; Centermontering; Montering på kædestag; Montering med klemme; Montering på plade; Montering på bagaksel; Montering på baggaffelende; Bagmontering; Montering på sadelstag; Andet